zh-TW: 腿部開口高度: 高; 低; 中; 其他
nb: Høyde på benutskjæring: Høy; Lav; Middels; Annet
pt-BR: Perna corte altura: Alto; Baixo; Médio; Outro
it: Altezza del taglio della gamba: Alto; Basso; Medio; Altro
sv: Benöppningens höjd: Hög; Låg; Medel; Övrigt
pt-PT: Altura do corte da perna: Alta; Baixa; Média; Outro
hu: Lábkivágás magassága: Magas; Alacsony; Közepes; Egyéb
de: Höhe des Beinausschnitts: Hoch; Niedrig; Mittel; Sonstige
ja: 脚のカット高さ: ハイ; ロー; ミドル; その他
tr: Bacak kesim yüksekliği: Yüksek; Düşük; Orta; Diğer
ko: 다리 절단 높이: 높음; 낮음; 중간; 기타
fr: Hauteur d’échancrure de la jambe: Haute; Basse; Moyenne; Autre
sl-SI: Višina nožnega izreza: Visoko; Nizko; Srednje; Drugo
fi: Jalan leikkauskorkeus: Korkea; Matala; Keskikorkea; Muu
es: Altura del corte de pierna: Alto; Bajo; Medio; Otro
da: Snithøjde ved ben: Høj; Lav; Mellem; Andet
th: ความสูงของการตัดขา: สูง; ต่ำ; กลาง; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Височина на изрязване на крачола: Висока; Ниска; Средна; Друга
zh-CN: 腿部裁剪高度: 高; 低; 中; 其他
vi: Chiều cao cắt ống quần: Cao; Thấp; Trung bình; Khác
cs: Výška řezu nohavic: Vysoký; Nízký; Střední; Jiné
ru: Высота выреза бедра: Высокий; Низкий; Средний; Другое
pl: Wysokość wycięcia nogawki: Wysoki; Niski; Średni; Inne
el: Ύψος κοψίματος στο πόδι: Ψηλό; Χαμηλό; Μεσαίο; Άλλο
en: Leg cut height: High; Low; Mid; Other
sk-SK: Výška výstrihu na nohe: Vysoký; Nízky; Stredný; Iné
ro-RO: Înălțimea croielii la picior: Înalt; Scăzut; Mediu; Altele
nl: Beenopening hoogte: Hoog; Laag; Midden; Overig
lt-LT: Kojos iškirpimo aukštis: Aukštas; Žemas; Vidutinis; Kita
hr-HR: Visina reza nogu: Visoki; Niski; Srednji; Ostalo